Utah statutes.
53A-15-1217.   Agreements for online instruction.

(1)  In addition to offering online courses to students through the Statewide Online Education Program, a school district or charter school may enter into an agreement with another school district or charter school or a consortium of school districts or charter schools to provide online instruction to the school district's or charter school's students.

(2)  Online instruction offered pursuant to Subsection (1) is not subject to the requirements of this part.



Enacted by Chapter 238, 2012 General Session

